Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5142.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 35-16-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-16 entitled "Revenue
Estimating Conferences" is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-16-2. Meetings.
(a) The principals of the R.E.C. shall meet within the first ten (10) days of May and last
ten (10) days of April and the first ten (10) days of November of each year.
(b) The primary purpose of regularly scheduled conferences is to prepare economic
forecasts and forecast revenue estimates and review current revenue collections under current tax
law. The conference principals can agree, however, to address special legislation or special topics.
(c) Prior to each R.E.C., the principals will determine the documentation and information
necessary to support that conference.
(d) No votes will be taken in the revenue estimating conferences. These are truly consensus
conferences and all principals must agree and are bound to the conference recommendations.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000114
========